Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-516.03
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Alzheimer's Special Care Disclosure Act:

(1) Alzheimer's special care unit means any nursing facility or assisted-living facility, licensed by the department, which secures, segregates, or provides a special program or special unit for residents with a diagnosis of probable Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or a related disorder and which advertises, markets, or otherwise promotes the facility as providing specialized Alzheimer's disease, dementia, or related disorder care services;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services; and

(3) Memory care endorsement has the same meaning as in section 71-422.01.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 164;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 500;

Laws 1997, LB 608, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 388;

Laws 2016, LB698, § 25.
July 21, 2016